hr-HR: Područje primjene ulja za predenje: Sva područja (kolovrat); Ležajevi špule; Osovina pogonskog kotača; Ležajevi letka; Spojevi pogonske poluge; Stupovi letka; Šarke papučice; Ostalo
pl: Obszar zastosowania oleju do kołowrotków: Wszystkie obszary (kołowrotek); Łożyska szpuli; Oś koła napędowego; Łożyska skrzydełka; Przeguby korbowodu; Wsporniki; Zawiasy pedału; Inne
es: Área de la aplicación de aceite giratorio: Todas las áreas (rueca de hilar); Rodamientos de bobina; Eje de rueda motriz; Rodamientos de aleta; Juntas de la biela; Soportes laterales; Bisagras del pedal; Otro
bg-BG: Зона на приложение на масло за спинингово колело: Всички области (хурка); Лагери на калерчето; Ос на задвижващото колело; Лагери на флаера; Сглобки на педала; Колонки (Maidens); Панти на педала; Друго
ja: 紡績油の塗布箇所: 全領域 (糸車); ボビンベアリング; 駆動輪軸; フライヤーベアリング; フットマンジョイント; メイデン; ペダルヒンジ; その他
fi: Kehruuöljyn käyttöalue: Kaikki alueet (rukki); Puolan laakerit; Vetopyörän akseli; Lyhdyn laakerit; Polkimen nivelet; Kehräpuut; Polkimen saranat; Muu
zh-CN: 纺丝油应用领域: 所有区域（纺车）; 筒管轴承; 驱动轮轴; 锭翼轴承; 踏板连杆接头; 锭翼支架; 踏板铰链; 其他
ru: Область применения масла для прялки: Все элементы (прялка); Подшипники катушки; Ось приводного колеса; Подшипники рогульки; Соединения шатуна; Стойки; Петли педали; Другое
nl: Spinolie toepassingsgebied: Alle gebieden (spinnewiel); Spoellagers; Aandrijfwielas; Vluchtlagers; Trekstangscharnieren; Vluchthouders; Trapperscharnieren; Overige
nb: Bruksområde for tekstilolje: Alle områder (rokkehjul); Spolelagre; Drivhjulsaksel; Vingelagre; Trøeledd; Oppstandere; Pedalhengsler; Annet
de: Einsatzbereich des Spinnöls: Alle Bereiche (Spinnrad); Spulenlager; Antriebsradachse; Flügellager; Knechtgelenke; Docken; Trittbrettscharniere; Sonstige
ko: 스피닝 오일 적용 영역: 전 영역(물레); 보빈 베어링; 구동 휠 차축; 플라이어 베어링; 풋맨 관절; 메이든; 페달 힌지; 기타
pt-BR: Óleo para roda de fiar área de aplicação: Todas as áreas (roda de fiar); Rolamentos da bobina; Eixo da roda motriz; Rolamentos do flyer; Juntas da biela; Postes de suporte; Dobradiças do pedal; Outros
cs: Oblast aplikace rotačního oleje: Všechny části (kolovrátek); Ložiska cívky; Osa hnacího kola; Ložiska křídla; Spoje táhla; Sloupky; Závěsy pedálu; Jiné
it: Area di applicazione dell'olio di filatura: Tutte le aree (filatoio); Cuscinetti della bobina; Asse della ruota motrice; Cuscinetti dell'aletta; Giunti del tirante; Montanti; Cerniere del pedale; Altro
da: Anvendelsesområde for spinderoksolie: Alle områder (spinderok); Spolelejer; Drivhjulsaksel; Vingelejer; Trækkestangssamlinger; Jomfruer; Trædebrætshængsler; Andet
th: พื้นที่ใช้งานน้ำมันหล่อลื่นสำหรับล้อหมุน: ทุกส่วน (เครื่องปั่นด้าย); ลูกปืนกระสวย; เพลาล้อขับเคลื่อน; ลูกปืนฟลายเออร์; ข้อต่อฟุตแมน; เมเดนส์; บานพับที่เหยียบ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Verpimo alyvos naudojimo sritis: Visos sritys (verpimo ratelis); Ritės guoliai; Pavaros rato ašis; Skraidyklės guoliai; Pedalo traukės jungtys; Statramsčiai; Pedalo vyriai; Kita
el: Σημείο εφαρμογής λαδιού γνεσίματος: Όλες οι περιοχές (ανέμη); Ρουλεμάν μασουριού; Άξονας κινητήριου τροχού; Ρουλεμάν πτερωτής; Αρθρώσεις πεντάλ; Βάσεις πτερωτής; Μεντεσέδες πεντάλ; Άλλο
en: Spinning oil application area: All areas (spinning wheel); Bobbin bearings; Drive wheel axle; Flyer bearings; Footman joints; Maidens; Treadle hinges; Other
ro-RO: Zonă de aplicare pentru uleiul de filare: Toate zonele (roată de tors); Rulmenți pentru bobină; Ax roată de antrenare; Rulmenți flyer; Articulații tijă de tracțiune (footman); Suporturi ax (maidens); Balamale pedală; Altele
zh-TW: 紡紗油塗抹區域: 所有區域 (紡車); 線軸軸承; 驅動輪軸; 紡翼軸承; 踏板連桿接頭; 紡翼支柱; 踏板鉸鏈; 其他
pt-PT: Área de aplicação do óleo para roda giratória: Todas as áreas (roda de fiar); Rolamentos da bobina; Eixo da roda motriz; Rolamentos do flyer; Articulações do estribo; Suportes do flyer; Dobradiças do pedal; Outro
sk-SK: Oblasť aplikácie pradiarenského oleja: Všetky časti (kolovrat); Ložiská cievky; Os hnacieho kolesa; Ložiská krídla; Kĺby tiahla; Stĺpiky; Pánty pedála; Iné
fr: Points d’application de l’huile pour rouet: Toutes les zones (rouet); Roulements de bobine; Axe de la roue d’entraînement; Roulements d’épinglier; Joints de bielle; Montants; Charnières de pédale; Autre
tr: Eğirme yağı uygulama alanı: Tüm alanlar (çıkrık); Masura rulmanları; Tahrik tekerleği aksı; Kelebek rulmanları; Pedal kolu bağlantıları; Taşıyıcı kollar; Pedal menteşeleri; Diğer
hu: Fonalfolyadék felviteli terület: Minden terület (rokka); Orsócsapágyak; Hajtókerék tengelye; Szárnycsapágyak; Hajtórúd csuklói; Bábuk; Pedálzsanérok; Egyéb
vi: Khu vực ứng dụng dầu quay: Mọi khu vực (xa quay sợi); Vòng bi ống chỉ; Trục bánh đà; Vòng bi guồng quay; Khớp nối bàn đạp; Trụ đỡ guồng quay (Maidens); Bản lề bàn đạp; Khác
sl-SI: Območje nanosa olja za kolovrat: Vsa področja (kolovrat); Ležaji vretena; Os pogonskega kolesa; Ležaji krilca; Zglobi pogonske ojnice; Nosilci (maidens); Tečaji pedala; Drugo
sv: Appliceringsområde för spinnrocksolja: Alla områden (spinnrock); Spollager; Drivhjulsaxel; Vinglager; Vevstaksleder; Dockor; Trampleder; Annat